Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1318
Arbitration board; hearing; testimony; evidence; witnesses.

At the hearing the arbitration board shall hear testimony and receive evidence in person or by deposition relating to the dispute and may continue the hearing from time to time. The arbitration board shall be bound by the rules of evidence applicable in district court. The arbitration board may require a party to submit such evidence as the board may deem necessary or desirable for making its decision and the board is authorized to subpoena witnesses and documents. Opportunity shall be afforded to both parties to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. The parties may be represented by counsel.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 18.